District of Columbia statutes.
29-303.01

Purposes.

(a)

Every corporation incorporated under this chapter shall have the purpose of engaging in any lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation.

(b)

A corporation engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another law of the District may incorporate under this chapter only if permitted by, and subject to all limitations of, the other law.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1302.01.